Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Chapter 29. Institute for Technology Development

§ 31-29-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, “general obligation bonds” means bonds of the State of Mississippi, to the repayment of which, both as to principal and interest, the full faith, credit and taxing power of the State of Mississippi are irrevocably pledged until the principal and interest is paid in full.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1987).

§ 31-29-3.
Authorization to issue bonds to defray unappropriated expenses of Institute for Technology Development; limitations as to amount.

The State Bond Commission shall have the power and is hereby authorized, at one time or from time to time prior to June 30, 1994, to issue negotiable general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi to pay all or any part of the cost of defraying the state’s share of supporting the Institute for Technology Development for any fiscal year in which the institute does not receive the requisite amount pursuant to legislative appropriation. The total amount of bonds which may be issued pursuant to this chapter shall not exceed Six Million Dollars ($6,000,000.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 437, § 2; Laws, 1990, ch. 503, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch 541, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 31-29-5.
Issuance of bonds; repayment; ad valorem tax on property.

Upon the adoption of a resolution by the Board of Directors of the Institute for Technology Development declaring the necessity for the issuance of any part or all of the general obligation bonds authorized by this chapter, the board shall deliver a certified copy of its resolution to the State Board of Economic Development, the Chairmen of the Appropriations Committees of the Senate and the House of Representatives, the Chairman of the Finance Committee of the Senate and the Chairman of the Ways and Means Committee of the House of Representatives. Upon receipt of the resolution, the Board of Economic Development may approve such bond issuance by resolution and certify such resolution to the State Bond Commission. Upon the receipt of same, the State Bond Commission shall issue and sell bonds in an amount requested, and do any and all things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds. For the payment of such bonds and the interest thereon, the full faith, credit and taxing power of the State of Mississippi are hereby irrevocably pledged. If the Legislature shall find that there are funds available in the General Fund of the Treasury of the State of Mississippi in amounts sufficient to pay maturity, principal and accruing interest of such general obligation bonds and if the Legislature shall appropriate such available funds for the purpose of paying such maturity, principal and accruing interest, then the principal, maturity and accruing interest of such bonds shall be paid from appropriations made from the General Fund of the Treasury of the State of Mississippi by the Legislature thereof; but if there are not available sufficient funds in the General Fund of the Treasury of the State of Mississippi to pay the maturity, principal and accruing interest of such bonds, or if such funds are available and the Legislature should fail to appropriate a sufficient amount thereof to pay such principal and accruing interest as the same becomes due, then, and in that event, there shall annually be levied upon all taxable property within the State of Mississippi an ad valorem tax at a rate sufficient to provide the funds required to pay the bonds at maturity and the interest thereon as the same accrues. Such bonds shall bear such date or dates, be in such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such rate or rates (not to exceed that rate established in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972), be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, shall mature absolutely at such time or times, be redeemable prior to maturity at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges, and shall be substantially in such form, all as shall be determined by resolution of the State Bond Commission. Such bonds shall be signed by the Chairman of the State Bond Commission or by his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the State Bond Commission shall be affixed thereto, attested by the Secretary of the State Bond Commission. The interest coupons to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures of such officers. Whenever any such bonds shall have been signed by the officials herein designated to sign the bonds who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers prior to the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until the delivery of the same to the purchaser or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 437, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1987).

§ 31-29-7.
Bonds to be negotiable instruments; bonds and income tax exempt.

All general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi and interest coupons issued under the provisions of this chapter shall have and are hereby declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the negotiable instruments law of the State of Mississippi. Such bonds and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation within the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 437, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1987).

§ 31-29-9.
Sale of bonds; price; notice of sale.

The State Bond Commission shall sell such bonds in the manner and at a price which will result in the lowest interest rate on the best terms obtainable for the state, but no such sale shall be made at a price less than par plus accrued interest to date of delivery of the bonds to the purchaser. Notice of the sale of any such bonds shall be published at least one time not less than ten (10) days prior to the date of sale and shall be so published in one or more newspapers having a general circulation in the City of Jackson and in one or more other newspapers or financial journals as may be directed by the State Bond Commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 437, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1987).

§ 31-29-11.
Institute for Technology Development Fund; proceeds of bonds to be used solely for support of institute.

Upon the issuance and sale of such bonds, the State Bond Commission shall transfer the proceeds of any such sale or sales to a special fund in the State Treasury to be known as the “Institute for Technology Development Fund.” The proceeds of such bonds shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the state’s share of supporting the Institute for Technology Development, which shall include costs incident to the issuance and sale of such bonds, and shall be disbursed solely upon the order of the State Treasurer under such restrictions, if any, as may be contained in the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 437, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1987).

§ 31-29-13.
Right of holders of bonds or interest coupons.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter or of any of the interest coupons pertaining thereto may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights granted hereunder, or under such resolution, and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this chapter to be performed, in order to provide for the payment of bonds and interest thereon.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 437, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1987).

§ 31-29-15.
Necessity of other proceedings or conditions for issuance of bonds; validation of bonds.

Such general obligation bonds may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions and things which are specified or required by this chapter. Any resolution providing for the issuance of general obligation bonds under the provisions of this chapter shall become effective immediately upon its adoption by the State Bond Commission, and any such resolution may be adopted at any regular, special or adjourned meeting of the State Bond Commission by a majority of its members.

The bonds authorized under the authority of this chapter may, in the discretion of the State Bond Commission, be validated in the Chancery Court of Hinds County, Mississippi, in the manner and with the force and effect provided now or hereafter by Chapter 13, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district and other bonds. The necessary papers for such validation proceedings shall be transmitted to the State Bond Commission, and the required notice shall be published in a newspaper published in the City of Jackson, Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 437, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1987).

§ 31-29-17.
Bonds as legal investments and securities.

All bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries, and for savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, and such bonds shall be legal securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and political subdivisions for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 437, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1987).

§ 31-29-19.
Authority for exercise of powers.

This chapter shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the exercise of the powers herein granted.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 437, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1987).

§ 31-29-21.
Withdrawal of funds from Institute for Technology Development Fund.

The funds which are transferred from the sale of bonds under this chapter to the special fund in the State Treasury known as the “Institute for Technology Development Fund” may be withdrawn only in the following manner: Such funds shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Management Board, which warrants shall be issued upon requisition signed by the State Treasurer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 437, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1987).

§ 31-29-23.
Representation by Attorney General in issuing, selling and validating bonds; costs and expenses of issuance of bonds.

Except as otherwise authorized in Section 7-5-39, the Attorney General of the State of Mississippi shall represent the State Bond Commission in issuing, selling and validating bonds herein provided for, and the bond commission is hereby authorized and empowered to expend from the proceeds derived from the sale of the bonds authorized hereunder all necessary administrative, legal and other expenses incidental and related to the issuance of bonds authorized under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 437, § 12; Laws, 2012, ch. 546, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 31-29-25.
Audit of Institute for Technology Development.

Audits of the Institute for Technology Development (ITD) are to be performed by the State Auditor in accordance with the provisions of this section. Such audits shall be conducted by the State Auditor in a manner that will result in the review of the ITD’s use of funds from the perspective of ITD’s fiscal year, not the state’s fiscal year. In conducting these audits, the State Auditor may rely to the maximum extent possible upon audits of ITD conducted by independent auditors in accordance with the provisions of the “Standards for Audit of Governmental Organizations, Programs, Activities and Functions” published by the Comptroller General of the United States and Circular A-133 “Audits of Institutions of Higher Learning and Other Non-Profit Institutions” published by the Office of Management and Budget. ITD shall present the results of any and all such audits to the State Auditor for review and incorporation into his reports to the Legislative Budget Committee.

For any state fiscal year during which the Institute for Technology Development receives funds from the State of Mississippi, the State Department of Audit shall conduct a financial and legal compliance audit with respect to the use of such funds by the institute. The department shall incorporate in its audit report any recommendations it has concerning the financial and management control practices of the institute. The department shall report its findings and recommendations to the Legislative Budget Committee which shall make them available to members of the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 386, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch 541, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 31-29-27.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 402, § 3, effective from and after July 1, 2017.

§31-29-27. [Laws, 1990, ch. 503, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1990).]

§ 31-29-29.
Institute for Technology Development (ITD) to establish and administer grants program for inventors and small businesses; maximum grants and purposes therefor; ITD royalties.

The Institute for Technology Development (ITD) is authorized to establish and administer four (4) programs to provide assistance grants to developers of inventions or innovative ideas, using funds appropriated by the Legislature for that purpose and other funds available to ITD for that purpose. The four (4) programs shall provide moneys to inventors, innovators and small businesses to defray part of the costs of:

Having evaluations of inventions or innovative ideas prepared;

Developing new inventions or innovative ideas;

Preparing applications for federal Small Business Innovative Research (SBIR) grants; and

Supporting small businesses during the gap period between Phase I and Phase II SBIR grants.

The first program shall provide grants to help inventors and innovators defray up to fifty percent (50%) of the cost of having an evaluation prepared of the technical and economic merits of the invention or innovative idea. The maximum amount of a grant for any one (1) invention or innovative idea shall be Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00). ITD itself may perform any evaluation that it is qualified to perform, and may charge a fee to the inventor or innovator for the evaluation. As a condition of providing a grant for an invention or innovative idea under this program, ITD may require the inventor or innovator to agree to pay a royalty to ITD of a percentage of any proceeds earned from the invention or innovative idea if it should become successful. The revenues generated for ITD from any fees for performing evaluations and from any such royalties shall be used to provide additional grants under this program.

The second program shall provide grants to help inventors and innovators defray up to twenty percent (20%) of the cost of developing a new invention or innovative idea. The maximum amount of a grant for any one (1) invention or innovative idea shall be Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) for the first two (2) years of the program, and thereafter shall be such higher limit as determined by ITD. ITD may charge a fee to inventors and innovators who receive financial support for an invention or innovative idea with the use of a grant from the program. As a condition of providing a grant for an invention or innovative idea under this program, ITD may require the inventor or innovator to agree to pay to ITD a royalty of a percentage of any proceeds earned from the invention or innovative idea if it should become successful. The revenues generated for ITD from any such fees and royalties shall be used to provide additional grants under this program.

The third program shall provide grants to help small businesses defray up to fifty percent (50%) of the cost of preparing applications for federal Small Business Innovative Research (SBIR) grants, which assist small businesses in commercializing new inventions and innovative ideas. The maximum amount of a grant for any one (1) recipient shall be Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00).

The fourth program shall provide grants to help small businesses defray up to twenty-five percent (25%) of the cost of supporting the business during the gap period between the exhaustion of Phase I SBIR grant funds and the receipt of Phase II SBIR grant funds. The maximum amount of a grant for any one (1) small business shall be Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00). As a condition of providing a grant to a small business under this program, ITD may require the small business to agree to pay to ITD a royalty of a percentage of any proceeds earned from the invention or innovative idea of the business if it should become successful. The revenues generated for ITD from any such royalties shall be used to provide additional grants under this program.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 415, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.